Wisconsin, session 2025, SB447.
do enact as follows:SB447,11Section 1. 252.04 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB447,2,122252.04 (3) The immunization requirement is waived if the student, if an 3adult, or the student’s parent, guardian, or legal custodian submits a written 4statement to the school, child care center, or nursery school objecting to the 5immunization for reasons of health, religion, or personal conviction. At the time 6any school, child care center, or nursery school notifies a student, parent, guardian, 7or legal custodian of the immunization requirements, it shall inform the person in 8writing of the person’s right to a waiver under this subsection. A school, child care 9center, or nursery school shall provide a procedure for presenting the waiver to the 10school, child care center, or nursery school with each health-related form it requires 11a student, parent, guardian, or legal custodian to complete before the student may 12be enrolled or admitted.SB447,2,1313